Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,347
Minibikes; exemptions from certain requirements.

Minibikes, their owners, and their operators shall be exempt from the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, and the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1196, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 285, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 731, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 132;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 60-2101.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 443;

Laws 2004, LB 812, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 249.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.